Tables/Contraction/de-g2.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2026 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - German (contracted - 2015 standard)
# Created by Mario Lang <mlang@tugraz.at>.

include de-g1.ctb

class a a
class aeu aeu
class b b
class f f
class h h
class i i
class m m
class n n
class r r
class hilmnrsu hilmnrsu
class l l
class lnr lnr
class cegn cegn
class st st
class konsonant bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz

# Prefixes ending with -a
sufword klima =
sufword pharma 1234-125-356-134-1
sufword propaganda 12345-1234-1-1245-235-145-1
sufword prostata 12345-23456-1-2345-1
sufword yoga =

begword aal = shouldn't use the al-contraction
sufword aar =
sufword saar =
sufword saat =
always aargau 1-1-1235-1245-16 shouldn't use the ar-contraction
always account =
always afrika =
always afrikaner 1-124-1235-24-13-235-12456
always afrikanisch 1-124-1235-24-13-235-24-156
always afrikanist 1-124-1235-24-13-235-24-23456
always afrikanistisch 1-124-1235-24-13-235-5-156

prfword aktie =
always aktien 1-13-2345-24-14
always aldehyd 25-145-15-125-6-13456-145
always alemann 25-15-134-235-1345 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always alkohol 25-13-135-125-135-123
sufword alpha 25-1234-125-1
always aluminium 25-136-134-35-24-136-134

always antisozial 235-2345-24-234-123
always arhythm =
always atelier 1-2345-13456-24-12456

before hilmnrsu always aufnahme 2-16-1345-134-15
prfword aufnahmen 2-16-1345-134-14
before t always ausbeu 16-234-12-126 shouldn't use the be-contraction
before t always austrit 16-234-2345-1235-24-2345 shouldn't use the st-contraction

always abballer 1-12-12-1-12345-12456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
sufword baller 12-1-12345-12456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
always abbeiz 1-12-12-146-1356 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always abbettel 1-12-23-2345-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always ableismus 1-12-123-15-5-24 shouldn't use the ei-contraction
before e always ablöse =
before hilmnrsu always abnahme 1-12-1345-134-15
prfword abnahmen 1-12-1345-134-14
always absolvent 1-12-234-135-123-1236-14-2345
always achilles 1-1456-24-12345-123456
begword achtel 1-1456-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction

always schachtel 156-56-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction

always akkordeon 1-13-13-26-145-15-135-1345 Akkordeonist shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always altersteilzeit 25-2345-12456-234-2345-146-123-1356-2345
always alteurop 25-2345-126-1235-135-1234
always sampel 234-1-134-1234-13456
before cost always amts = shouldn't use the sch-contraction
begmidword anachron 235-1-1456-1235-135-1345
always analyse 235-25-6-13456-234-15
prfword analysen 235-25-6-13456-234-14
always analysenauf 235-25-6-13456-234-14-2-16
always analysenergeb 235-25-6-13456-234-14-12456-12346-12
before konsonant always analysen 235-25-6-13456-234-14
always apostroph 1-1234-135-23456-1235-135-1234-125 apostrophier shouldn't use the hier-contraction
always angeber 235-12346-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction

always anzeigenummer 235-1356-146-12346-1345-136-1346-12456
always anzeigeröhr 235-1356-146-12346-1235-246-125-1235


always abonnement 1-12-135-1345-1345-15-134-14-2345
always agreement 1-1245-1235-15-15-134-14-2345
always amüsement 1-134-1256-234-15-134-14-2345
always appartement 1-1234-1234-356-236-134-14-2345
always bombardement 12-135-134-12-356-145-15-134-14-2345
always etablissement 15-2345-1-12-123-24-2346-15-134-14-2345
always implement 24-134-1234-123-15-134-14-2345
always inkrement 35-13-1235-15-134-14-2345
before t always komplemen 13-135-134-1234-123-15-134-14
always konnossement 13-135-1345-1345-135-2346-15-134-14-2345
before t always reglemen 1235-15-1245-123-15-134-14
before t always temperamen 2345-12356-1234-12456-1-134-14

always arbeitgeber 356-12-12346-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always auftraggeber 2-16-2345-1245-12346-12-12456
always dienstgeber 145-346-1345-23456-12346-12-12456
always gastgeber 1245-1-23456-12346-12-12456
always gesetzgeber 12346-2-15-12346-12-12456
always herausgeber 125-12456-16-234-12346-12-12456
always impulsgeber 24-134-1234-136-123-234-12346-12-12456
always namensgeber 1345-1-134-14-234-12346-12-12456
always zeitgeber 1356-2345-12346-12-12456

always anrainen 235-1235-1-24-1345-14 shouldn't use the in-contraction
always anrainer 235-1235-1-24-1345-12456 shouldn't use the in-contraction
always arthrose 356-2345-125-1235-135-234-15
prfword arthrosen 356-2345-125-1235-135-234-14
before e always arzteh 356-1356-2345-2356
sufword apostel 1-1234-135-23456-13456 Apostellöffel shouldn't use the stell-contraction
always aqua =
always ligaquali 123-45-1-6-12345-25-24
sufword armeleute 356-134-15-123-126-236
always autoreifen 16-2345-135-1235-146-124-14
always autorück 16-2345-135-1235-46
always ägypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always ämpter 345-134-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always aegypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14
always audienz 16-145-24-14-1356 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always aufgaben 2-16-1245-1-12-14
prfword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-135-1235
begmidword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-26
before hilmnrsu always bade =
prfword baden 12-1-145-14
prfword badend 12-1-145-14-145
prfword badende 12-1-145-14-145-15
prfword badendem 12-1-145-14-145-12356
prfword badenden 12-1-145-14-145-14
prfword badender 12-1-145-14-145-12456
prfword badendes 12-1-145-14-145-123456
prfword bades 12-1-145-123456

always bacterium 12-1-6-14-2345-12456-24-136-134 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always bakteri 12-1-13-2345-12456-24 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always deuterium 145-126-2345-12456-24-136-134 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always basis =
prfword basisch 12-1-234-24-156
prfword basische 12-1-234-24-156-15
prfword basischem 12-1-234-24-156-12356
prfword basischen 12-1-234-24-156-14
prfword basischer 12-1-234-24-156-12456
prfword basisches 12-1-234-24-156-123456


always baufabrik 12-16-124-1-12-1235-24-13 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always baufahr 12-16-2-1235
always baufieber 12-16-124-346-12-12456 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always baufirma 12-16-124-24-1235-134-1
always baufirmen 12-16-124-24-1235-134-14
always beamten 23-1-134-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
word beat =
always beatbox =
always beatmusik 12-15-1-2345-134-13
always beatnik =
always backbeat 12-1-46-12-15-1-2345
word offbeat = Sauerstoffbeatmung
always popbeat =
always rockbeat 1235-135-46-12-15-1-2345

always befund 23-124-256-145
always behindert 23-125-35-145-12456-2345
prfword behinderte 23-125-35-145-12456-236




prfword ausmerzungen 16-234-134-12456-1356-136-14
prfword ätzungen 345-2345-1356-136-14
prfword benutzungen 23-1345-1356-136-14
prfword bestürzungen 23-23456-1256-1235-1356-136-14
prfword grenzungen 1245-1235-14-1356-136-14
prfword heizungen 125-146-1356-136-14
prfword eheizungen 15-125-146-1356-136-14
prfword erhitzungen 12456-125-24-2345-1356-136-14
prfword filzungen 124-24-123-1356-136-14
prfword hetzungen 125-15-2345-1356-136-14
prfword holzungen 125-135-123-1356-136-14
prfword kreuzungen 13-1235-126-1356-136-14
endword letzungen 123-15-2345-1356-136-14 should use the ung-contraction
prfword netzungen 1345-15-2345-1356-136-14
prfword pflanzungen 1234-124-123-235-1356-136-14
prfword reizungen 1235-146-1356-136-14
prfword ritzungen 1235-24-2345-1356-136-14
prfword salzungen 234-25-1356-136-14
prfword schanzungen 156-235-1356-136-14
prfword schatzungen 156-1-2345-1356-136-14
prfword schätzungen 156-345-2345-1356-136-14
prfword schmelzungen 156-134-13456-1356-136-14
prfword schmutzungen 156-134-136-2345-1356-136-14
prfword schwärzungen 156-2456-345-1235-1356-136-14
prfword setzungen 2-15-136-14
prfword sitzungen 2-24-136-14
prfword spitzungen 234-1234-24-2345-1356-136-14
prfword spritzungen 234-1234-1235-24-2345-1356-136-14
prfword stürzungen 23456-1256-1235-1356-136-14
prfword stützungen 23456-1256-2345-1356-136-14
prfword sstützungen 234-23456-1256-2345-1356-136-14
prfword wälzungen 2456-345-123-1356-136-14
prfword würzungen 2456-1256-1235-1356-136-14



always heizung 125-146-1356-136
always schätzung 156-345-2345-1356-136



word beinah 2-12-1345-1-125
word beiname 2-12-1345-1-134-15
word beinamen 2-12-1345-1-134-14
word beinamens 2-12-1345-1-134-14-234
sufword beinahe 2-12-1345-1-125-15
sufword beinerv 2-12-1345-12456-1236
always beinsatz 12-1246-234-1356
always beizmittel 12-146-1356-134-2345 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always benediktin 12-14-15-145-24-13-2345-35 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always benefiz 12-14-15-124-24-1356
always berater 23-1235-1-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always beschwerd 23-156-2456-12456-145 shouldn't use the werd-contraction
before hilmnrsu always beschwerde 23-156-2456-12456-145-15 shouldn't use the werd-contraction
prfword beschwerden 23-156-2456-12456-145-14 shouldn't use the werd-contraction
endword betrieben 23-2345-1235-346-12-14
always binär =
word binational 12-24-1345-5-1345-1-123
begword binational 12-24-1345-5-1345-25
word binomial 12-24-1345-135-134-24-1-123
begword binomial 12-24-1345-135-134-24-25
always binomisch 12-24-1345-135-134-24-156
always bindehaut 12-35-145-15-125-16-2345 shouldn't use the eh-contraction
always bindehäu 12-35-145-15-125-34 shouldn't use the eh-contraction
always bindemittel 12-35-145-15-134-2345 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always schaummittel 156-16-134-134-2345 shouldn't use the mm-contraction
always bibel 12-24-12-13456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
sufword bistro 12-24-23456-1235-135 shouldn't use the bist-contraction
sufword blau 12-123-16
before g always bleiber 12-123-146-12-12456 shouldn't use the bleib-contraction
sufword bogen 12-135-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
before hilmnrsu always bronze =
before e always brück 12-1235-1256-46 shouldn't use the rück-contraction
always abrück 1-12-1235-46 should use the rück-contraction
always bundestags 12-256-145-123456-2345-1-1245-234
always bibliograph = bibliographieren shouldn't use the hier-contraction
sufword bistum = shouldn't use the st-contraction
sufword bistüm = shouldn't use the st-contraction

always blues =
always bluescreen =

always bomben 12-135-134-12-14
always bomber 12-135-134-12-12456

always buchstaben 12-136-1456-23456-1-12-14 shouldn't use the be-contraction
prfword bund 12-256-145
prfword bunds 12-256-145-234
sufword bunter 12-256-2345-12456 shouldn't use the unter-contraction
always burgunder 12-136-1235-1245-256-145-12456

before cost begword bus =
word busserl 12-136-2346-12456-123
word bussi 12-136-2346-24
word bussis 12-136-2346-24-234
sufword bussel 12-136-2346-13456
word busse 12-136-2346-15
word bussen 12-136-2346-14
word busses 12-136-2346-123456
sufword busch 12-136-156
always bussard 12-136-2346-356-145

always bügel 12-1256-1245-13456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always mangel 134-235-1245-13456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always mangelegen 134-235-1245-1245


before lnr always china 1456-35-1
before hilmnrsu begword code =
word codes 6-14-135-145-123456
before hilmnrsu always online 135-1345-123-35-15
